dix/not-common-apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
    <pardef n="another__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="other__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="several__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="her__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/is__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ese</l> 
        <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/at__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>at</l> 
        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="second__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="many__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="much__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enough__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="what__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_many__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_much__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="all__predet">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="al__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mine__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="everyone__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="something__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/is__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ese</l> 
        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/at__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>at</l> 
        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="both__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="all__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the_other__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="what__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="which_one__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_many__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_much__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="whose__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="what__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="those_who__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="that__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="'s__gen">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="gen"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hello__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="la lia">
        <i>la<b/>lia</i> 
        <par n="mine__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la mia">
        <i>la<b/>mia</i> 
        <par n="mine__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la nia">
        <i>la<b/>nia</i> 
        <par n="mine__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la ilia">
        <i>la<b/>ilia</i> 
        <par n="mine__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la via">
        <i>la<b/>via</i> 
        <par n="mine__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sekve de">
        <i>sekve<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tuj poste">
        <i>tuj<b/>poste</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="koste de">
        <i>koste<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="al super">
        <i>al<b/>super</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="krom ol">
        <i>krom<b/>ol</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pli ol">
        <i>pli<b/>ol</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malpli ol">
        <i>malpli<b/>ol</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ne malpli ol">
        <i>ne<b/>malpli<b/>ol</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ne pli ol">
        <i>ne<b/>pli<b/>ol</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ekster">
        <i>ekster</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="contraŭ">
        <i>contraŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="super">
        <i>super</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉe">
        <i>ĉe</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pere">
        <i>pere</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="spite">
        <i>spite</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="spite al">
        <i>spite<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ekster">
        <i>ekster</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="inkluzive de">
        <i>inkluzive<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="komence de">
        <i>komence de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="plu">
        <i>plu</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pri">
        <i>pri</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="proksimune">
        <i>proksimune<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anstataŭ">
        <i>anstataŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iom pli da">
        <i>iom<b/>pli<b/>da</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉicele">
        <i>ĉicele</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kun damaĝo al">
        <i>kun<b/>damaĝo<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="riske de">
        <i>riske<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dorse al">
        <i>dorse<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="direkte al">
        <i>direkte<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="je la nomo debase">
        <i>je<b/>la<b/>nomo<b/>debase</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="serĉante">
        <i>serĉante</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="komplice kun">
        <i>komplice<b/>kun</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kontraste kun">
        <i>kontraste<b/>kun</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kie ajn en">
        <i>kie<b/>ajn<b/>en</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sur la supro de">
        <i>sur<b/>la<b/>supro<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="garantie de">
        <i>garantie<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kune kun">
        <i>kune<b/>kun</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="miloj da">
        <i>miloj<b/>da</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pro timo al">
        <i>pro<b/>timo<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="laŭ opinio de">
        <i>laŭ<b/>opinio<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sen helpo de">
        <i>sen<b/>helpo<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pretekste de">
        <i>pretekste<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sub la puno de">
        <i>sub<b/>la<b/>puno<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
